Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska71-516.01
Act, how cited.

Sections 71-516.01 to 71-517 shall be known and may be cited as the Alzheimer's Special Care Disclosure Act.

Laws 1994, LB 1210, § 162;

Laws 2016, LB698, § 23.